Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2988
Articles of dissolution.

(1) A limited cooperative association that has dissolved or is about to dissolve shall deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution that state:

(a) The name of the limited cooperative association;

(b) The date that the limited cooperative association dissolved or when it will dissolve; and

(c) Any other information it deems relevant.

(2) A person has notice of a limited cooperative association's dissolution the later of ninety days after the filing of the statement or the effective date under subdivision (1)(b) of this section.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 88.